Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.060

Power to employ physician or surgeon—Compensation.

The coroner may summon a surgeon or physician to inspect the body and give under oath a professional opinion as to the cause of death. The fees for the coroner's physician or surgeon shall not be less than ten dollars.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.24.060. Prior: (i) 1901 c 131 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2780, part; 1863 p 560 s 6, part; 1854 p 436 s 6, part; RRS s 4184, part.]